Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.125

Board of directors.

The affairs of the corporation shall be managed by a board of directors. Directors need not be residents of this state or members or shareholders of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws so require. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 25.]